Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Treasurer, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 47,007,639
(2) Trust property services ............ $ 13,101,542
(3) Investment services .................. $ 62,200,924
(4) Public savings services ............. $ 12,504,619
(5) State and local government
financial services ...................... $ 22,984,622
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, expenditures by the State Treasurer
for trust property audit fees, investment expenses and costs incurred on  behalf of estates
are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5542 (SB 5542-A) Page 2